Maryland, session 2026, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1463*

HOUSE BILL 1463
3–2A–09.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND BEFORE
THE BEGINNING OF THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL HIRE
A CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON.
(2) THE PRESIDENT OF THE COUNTY BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH
COUNSEL FOR THE COUNTY BOARD, SHALL NEGOTIATE THE TERMS OF THE
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT FOR THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON.
(B) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REMOVAL
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE COUNTY BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL:
(1) ACT AS THE LIAISON BETWEEN THE COUNTY BOARD AND
MEMBERS OF THE COMMUNITY;
(2) ASSIST COMMUNITY MEMBERS IN ACCESSING SERVICES OF ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND OTHER STATE AND COUNTY
EDUCATION–RELATED SERVICES;
(3) ENGAGE COMMUNITY PARTNERS AND LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS TO
ADVANCE THE STRATEGIC GOALS OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS;
AND
(4) HAVE EXPERIENCE WORKING IN SPECIAL EDUCATION BEFORE
BEING HIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL RECEIVE AN ANNUAL
SALARY SET BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.